HunSpellDictionaries/bg_BG.aff
SFX R Y 160
SFX R   ера       ерат      .
SFX R   ера       ере       .
SFX R   ера       ерейки    .
SFX R   ера       ерели     .
SFX R   ера       ерелите   .
SFX R   ера       ерем      .
SFX R   ера       ерете     .
SFX R   ера       ереш      .
SFX R   ера       ереше     .
SFX R   ера       ерещи     .
SFX R   ера       ерещите   .
SFX R   ера       ери       .
SFX R   ера       ерял      .
SFX R   ера       еряла     .
SFX R   ера       ерялата   .
SFX R   ера       ерялия    .
SFX R   ера       ерялият   .
SFX R   ера       еряло     .
SFX R   ера       ерялото   .
SFX R   ера       ерях      .
SFX R   ера       еряха     .
SFX R   ера       еряхме    .
SFX R   ера       еряхте    .
SFX R   ера       ерящ      .
SFX R   ера       еряща     .
SFX R   ера       ерящата   .
SFX R   ера       ерящия    .
SFX R   ера       ерящият   .
SFX R   ера       ерящо     .
SFX R   ера       ерящото   .
SFX R   ера       ра        .
SFX R   ера       рал       .
SFX R   ера       рала      .
SFX R   ера       ралата    .
SFX R   ера       рали      .
SFX R   ера       ралите    .
SFX R   ера       ралия     .
SFX R   ера       ралият    .
SFX R   ера       рало      .
SFX R   ера       ралото    .
SFX R   ера       ран       .
SFX R   ера       рана      .
SFX R   ера       раната    .
SFX R   ера       рани      .
SFX R   ера       раните    .
SFX R   ера       рания     .
SFX R   ера       раният    .
SFX R   ера       рано      .
SFX R   ера       раното    .
SFX R   ера       рах       .
SFX R   ера       раха      .
SFX R   ера       рахме     .
SFX R   ера       рахте     .
SFX R   ея        ее        .
SFX R   ея        еейки     .
SFX R   ея        еел       .
SFX R   ея        еела      .
SFX R   ея        еелата    .
SFX R   ея        еели      .
SFX R   ея        еелите    .
SFX R   ея        еелия     .
SFX R   ея        еелият    .
SFX R   ея        еело      .
SFX R   ея        еелото    .
SFX R   ея        еем       .
SFX R   ея        еете      .
SFX R   ея        еех       .
SFX R   ея        ееха      .
SFX R   ея        еехме     .
SFX R   ея        еехте     .
SFX R   ея        ееш       .
SFX R   ея        ееше      .
SFX R   ея        еещ       .
SFX R   ея        ееща      .
SFX R   ея        еещата    .
SFX R   ея        еещи      .
SFX R   ея        еещите    .
SFX R   ея        еещия     .
SFX R   ея        еещият    .
SFX R   ея        еещо      .
SFX R   ея        еещото    .
SFX R   ея        ей        .
SFX R   ея        ейте      .
SFX R   ея        ели       .
SFX R   ея        елите     .
SFX R   ея        елия      .
SFX R   ея        елият     .
SFX R   ея        ени       .
SFX R   ея        ените     .
SFX R   ея        еят       .
SFX R   ея        я         .
SFX R   ея        ял        .
SFX R   ея        яла       .
SFX R   ея        ялата     .
SFX R   ея        яло       .
SFX R   ея        ялото     .
SFX R   ея        ян        .
SFX R   ея        яна       .
SFX R   ея        яната     .
SFX R   ея        яния      .
SFX R   ея        яният     .
SFX R   ея        яно       .
SFX R   ея        яното     .
SFX R   ея        ях        .
SFX R   ея        яха       .
SFX R   ея        яхме      .
SFX R   ея        яхте      .
SFX R   ша        са        .
SFX R   ша        сал       .
SFX R   ша        сала      .
SFX R   ша        салата    .
SFX R   ша        сали      .
SFX R   ша        салите    .
SFX R   ша        салия     .
SFX R   ша        салият    .
SFX R   ша        сало      .
SFX R   ша        салото    .
SFX R   ша        сан       .
SFX R   ша        сана      .
SFX R   ша        саната    .
SFX R   ша        сани      .
SFX R   ша        саните    .
SFX R   ша        сания     .
SFX R   ша        саният    .
SFX R   ша        сано      .
SFX R   ша        саното    .
SFX R   ша        сах       .
SFX R   ша        саха      .
SFX R   ша        сахме     .
SFX R   ша        сахте     .
SFX R   ша        шат       .
SFX R   ша        ше        .
SFX R   ша        шейки     .
SFX R   ша        шел       .
SFX R   ша        шела      .
SFX R   ша        шелата    .
SFX R   ша        шели      .
SFX R   ша        шелите    .
SFX R   ша        шелия     .
SFX R   ша        шелият    .
SFX R   ша        шело      .
SFX R   ша        шелото    .
SFX R   ша        шем       .
SFX R   ша        шете      .
SFX R   ша        шех       .
SFX R   ша        шеха      .
SFX R   ша        шехме     .
SFX R   ша        шехте     .
SFX R   ша        шеш       .
SFX R   ша        шеше      .
SFX R   ша        шещ       .
SFX R   ша        шеща      .
SFX R   ша        шещата    .
SFX R   ша        шещи      .
SFX R   ша        шещите    .
SFX R   ша        шещия     .
SFX R   ша        шещият    .
SFX R   ша        шещо      .
SFX R   ша        шещото    .
SFX R   ша        ши        .

SFX S Y 81
SFX S   ам        а         .
SFX S   ам        ай        .
SFX S   ам        айки      .
SFX S   ам        айте      .
SFX S   ам        ал        .
SFX S   ам        ала       .
SFX S   ам        алата     .
SFX S   ам        али       .
SFX S   ам        алите     .
SFX S   ам        алия      .
SFX S   ам        алият     .
SFX S   ам        ало       .
SFX S   ам        алото     .
SFX S   ам        аме       .
SFX S   ам        ан        .
SFX S   ам        ана       .
SFX S   ам        аната     .
SFX S   ам        ани       .
SFX S   ам        аните     .
SFX S   ам        ания      .
SFX S   ам        аният     .
SFX S   ам        ано       .
SFX S   ам        аното     .
SFX S   ам        ат        .
SFX S   ам        ате       .
SFX S   ам        ах        .
SFX S   ам        аха       .
SFX S   ам        ахме      .
SFX S   ам        ахте      .
SFX S   ам        аш        .
SFX S   ам        аше       .
SFX S   ам        ащ        .
SFX S   ам        аща       .
SFX S   ам        ащата     .
SFX S   ам        ащи       .
SFX S   ам        ащите     .
SFX S   ам        ащия      .
SFX S   ам        ащият     .
SFX S   ам        ащо       .
SFX S   ам        ащото     .
SFX S   я         ейки      .
SFX S   я         ели       .
SFX S   я         елите     .
SFX S   я         елия      .
SFX S   я         елият     .
SFX S   я         ени       .
SFX S   я         ените     .
SFX S   я         ете       .
SFX S   я         еше       .
SFX S   я         и         .
SFX S   я         им        .
SFX S   я         ите       .
SFX S   я         иш        .
SFX S   я         ял        .
SFX S   я         яла       .
SFX S   я         ялата     .
SFX S   я         ялия      .
SFX S   я         ялият     .
SFX S   я         яло       .
SFX S   я         ялото     .
SFX S   я         ян        .
SFX S   я         яна       .
SFX S   я         яната     .
SFX S   я         яния      .
SFX S   я         яният     .
SFX S   я         яно       .
SFX S   я         яното     .
SFX S   я         ят        .
SFX S   я         ях        .
SFX S   я         яха       .
SFX S   я         яхме      .
SFX S   я         яхте      .
SFX S   я         ящ        .
SFX S   я         яща       .
SFX S   я         ящата     .
SFX S   я         ящи       .
SFX S   я         ящите     .
SFX S   я         ящия      .
SFX S   я         ящият     .
SFX S   я         ящо       .
SFX S   я         ящото     .
